Washington statutes.
RCW 10.70.010

Commitment until fine and costs are paid.

When the defendant is adjudged to pay a fine and costs, the court shall order him or her to be committed to the custody of the sheriff until the fine and costs are paid or secured as provided by law.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1058; Code 1881 s 1119; 1873 p 242 s 277; 1854 p 123 s 141; RRS s 2200.]

NOTES:

Commitment for failure to pay fine and costs—Execution against defendant's property: RCW 10.82.030.

Stay of execution for sixty days on recognizance: RCW 10.82.020, 10.82.025.